Tennessee, session 114, HB0041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 2, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "wireless communication device" means a portable
wireless device that has the capability to provide voice, messaging, or other data
communication between two (2) or more parties, including, but not limited to:
(1) Cellular telephones;
(2) Tablet computers;
(3) Laptop computers; and
(4) Gaming devices.
(b) Each local board of education and public charter school governing body shall
adopt and implement a wireless communication device policy that:
(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(2)-(4), requires a student:
(A) In any of the grades kindergarten through eight (K-8) who
possesses a wireless communication device to keep the wireless
communication device turned off and stowed away during a classroom
instructional day; and
(B) In any of the grades nine through twelve (9-12) who
possesses a wireless communication device to keep the wireless
HB0041
000523
- 1 -

communication device turned off and stowed away during instructional
time;
(2) Authorizes a teacher to permit a student to use a wireless
communication device for educational purposes during instructional time;
(3) Permits a student to use a wireless communication device to monitor
the student's health concern as prescribed by the student's healthcare provider;
(4) Permits a student to use a wireless communication device during a
classroom instructional day or instructional time if the student's use of the
wireless communication device is included in the student's:
(A) Individualized education program under the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.); or
(B) Active 504 plan developed under Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. § 794); and
(5) Establishes a process by which parents of students will be contacted
in the event of an emergency or possible emergency at the school in which the
parent's student is enrolled.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
- 2 - 000523